src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verb inflection

!! Erzya language verbs inflect for person, subject and object.

LEXICON MorphTag ! to be removed IS_NUMORD_KUDO ведьгеменце
# ;
!LEXICON TV_TUEMS-ObjAll ! to be removed
!TV_TUEMS ;
LEXICON INTERJ-IMP-PL2 ! Work required
! адядо
+Imprt+ScPl2: # ;
LEXICON INTERJ-IMP-SG2 ! Work required
! адя
+Imprt+ScPl2: # ;
LEXICON INTERJ-IMP ! Work required
! адя, адядо
+Imprt: # ;

LEXICON V_ ! no stem type has been determined
+TYÄ: # ;

LEXICON V_KUNDAMS-TEST
+TYÄ: TV_KUNDAMS ;

!LEXICON V_PAIRS
!+V+Inf: # ;

LEXICON V_ARAS1
+Aux+Neg+Loc: V_ARAS1_01 ;
LEXICON V_ARAS1_01
+Prs+ScSg1:%>%{АЯ%}н K ;
+Prs+ScSg2:%>%{АЯ%}т K ;
+Prs+ScSg3: K ;
+Prs+ScPl1:%>т%{АЯ%}но K ;
+Prs+ScPl2:%>т%{АЯ%}до K ;
+Prs+ScPl3:%>т%{ЬØ%} K ;

+Prt2+ScSg1:%>%{оеэØ%}линь K ;
+Prt2+ScSg2:%>%{оеэØ%}лить K ;
+Prt2+ScSg3:%>%{оеэØ%}ль K ;
+Prt2+ScPl1:%>%{оеэØ%}линек K-lak ;
+Prt2+ScPl2:%>%{оеэØ%}лиде K ;
+Prt2+ScPl3:%>%{оеэØ%}льть K ;


!! OBJECT FLAGS AND +V tags
LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-CONJ !! а+V:а 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+Aux+Neg:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@  ConjPers-withO-all ;




LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1 !!= **@CODE@** а+V:эзь
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+Aux+Neg:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND_PRT1_ALL-BUT-Sc3 ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+Aux+Neg:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND_PRT1_30_ZERO ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+Aux+Neg:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND_PRT1_60_T ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+Aux+Neg:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ IND-PRT2-ALL ;

LEXICON BV_SEZEMS
 BV_LEDEMS ;
LEXICON BV_LEDEMS
 IV_LEDEMS ;
 TV_LEDEMS ;
LEXICON BV_KADOMS
 IV_KADOMS ;
 TV_KADOMS ;
LEXICON BV_NEVTEMS
 IV_NEVTEMS ;
 TV_NEVTEMS ;
LEXICON BV_SAVTOMS
 IV_SAVTOMS ;
 TV_SAVTOMS ;
LEXICON BV_CHACHTOMS
 IV_CHACHTOMS ;
 TV_CHACHTOMS ;
LEXICON BV_KUNDAMS
 IV_KUNDAMS ;
 TV_KUNDAMS ;
LEXICON BV_PIDEMS
 IV_PIDEMS ;
 TV_PIDEMS ;
LEXICON BV_E2ZHNEMS
 IV_E2ZHNEMS ;
 TV_E2ZHNEMS ;
LEXICON BV_KUNDAKSHNOMS
 IV_KUNDAKSHNOMS ;
 TV_KUNDAKSHNOMS ;
LEXICON BV_SATOMS
 IV_SATOMS ;
 TV_SATOMS ;
!LEXICON BV_UEMS
! IV_UEMS ;
! TV_UEMS ;
LEXICON BV_TUEMS
 IV_TUEMS ;
 TV_TUEMS ;
LEXICON BV_TEEMS
 IV_TEEMS ;
 TV_TEEMS ;
LEXICON BV_NEEMS
 IV_NEEMS ;
 TV_NEEMS ;
LEXICON BV_MIEMS
 IV_MIEMS ;
 TV_MIEMS ;
LEXICON BV_NEKSHNEMS
 IV_NEKSHNEMS ;
 TV_NEKSHNEMS ;
LEXICON BV_KUZEMS
 IV_KUZEMS ;
 TV_KUZEMS ;

LEXICON TV_LEDEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_LEDEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%} DERIVE-V2V-WITH-ONSET-VOWEL_FRONT ;

!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@!+V+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@!+V+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@!+V+Der/OvtOms+Der/njems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
!@U.TRANS.IV@!+V+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_KADOMS !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_KADOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%} DERIVE-V2V-WITH-ONSET-VOWEL_BACK ;

!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@!+V+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@!+V+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вт V_SAVTOMS ;
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@!+V+Der/OvtOms+Der/njems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_PIDEMS ;
!@U.TRANS.IV@!+V+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

! This should not occur
!LEXICON TV_SAEVEMS 
! @P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_SAEVEMS ;


LEXICON TV_NEVTEMS_SUB !!= **@CODE@** 
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: TV_NEVTEMS ;

LEXICON TV_NEVTEMS  !!≈ * _@CODE@_  невтемс:невть
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/njems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>не V_PIDEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_SAVTOMS_SUB !!= **@CODE@** 
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: TV_SAVTOMS ;

LEXICON TV_SAVTOMS !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_SAVTOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/njems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>не V_PIDEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вт V_SAVTOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON TV_SAVTOMS-SG3_SUBJ/ZERO !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Subj/Zero:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_SAVTOMS-SG3 ;
+Subj/Zero:  Deverbals-kadoms ;

LEXICON TV_CHACHTOMS !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_CHACHTOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/njems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>не V_PIDEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вт V_SAVTOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

!LEXICON TV_JANGAVOMS !!= __@CODE@__ 
! @P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON TV_KUNDAMS_SUB !!= **@CODE@** 
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: TV_KUNDAMS ;

LEXICON TV_KUNDAMS !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_KUNDAMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вт V_SAVTOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON TV_PIDEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_PIDEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_E2ZHNEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_PIDEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_KUNDAKSHNOMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_KUNDAMS ;


! This actually does exist in a pair verb
! таргатомс
LEXICON TV_SATOMS !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_SATOMS ;

! This should not exist by definition
! 
!LEXICON TV_LETEMS
! @P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_LETEMS ;

!LEXICON TV_UEMS !!= __@CODE@__ 
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_UEMS ;
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
!@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
!@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_TUEMS !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ IND_PRS_Obj ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_TUEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_TEEMS !!= **@CODE@** 
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_TEEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_NEEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_NEEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_MIEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_MIEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON TV_NEKSHNEMS  !!≈ * _@CODE@_  некшнемс:некшн
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_NEKSHNEMS ;
!!2012-04-24 the TAG "+Sem/ObjOpen": has been removed 

LEXICON TV_KUZEMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_KUZEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

!! VERBS WITH THIRD PERSON OBJECTS @U.CONJ-PX.13@

!LEXICON TV_LEDEMS-Obj3_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: TV_LEDEMS-Obj3 ;
LEXICON TV_LEDEMS-Obj3 !Checkme 2019-08 does this need 
: V_LEDEMS ;
@U.CONJ-PX.13@:@U.CONJ-PX.13@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.16@:@U.CONJ-PX.16@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.23@:@U.CONJ-PX.23@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.26@:@U.CONJ-PX.26@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.33@:@U.CONJ-PX.33@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.36@:@U.CONJ-PX.36@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.43@:@U.CONJ-PX.43@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.46@:@U.CONJ-PX.46@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.53@:@U.CONJ-PX.53@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.56@:@U.CONJ-PX.56@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.63@:@U.CONJ-PX.63@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
@U.CONJ-PX.66@:@U.CONJ-PX.66@ V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;

!LEXICON TV_KADOMS-Obj3_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: TV_KADOMS-Obj3 ;

!LEXICON TV_KADOMS-Obj3
!: V_KADOMS ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.13@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.16@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.23@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.26@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.33@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.36@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.43@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.46@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.53@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.56@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.63@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-PX.66@ V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

! This should not occur
!LEXICON TV_SAEVEMS-Obj3
! @U.CONJ-PX.13@ V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON BV_CONS_INITIAL_VERB_FORMS
IV_CONS_INITIAL_VERB_FORMS ;
TV_CONS_INITIAL_VERB_FORMS ;
LEXICON TV_CONS_INITIAL_VERB_FORMS
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@ V_CONS_INITIAL_VERB_FORMS ;
LEXICON IV_CONS_INITIAL_VERB_FORMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_CONS_INITIAL_VERB_FORMS ;
